Utah statutes.
20A-6-203.   Ballots for regular primary elections.

(1)  The lieutenant governor, together with county clerks, suppliers of election materials, and representatives of registered political parties, shall:

(a)  develop paper ballots, ballot labels, ballot sheets, and electronic ballots to be used in Utah's regular primary election;

(b)  ensure that the paper ballots, ballot labels, ballot sheets, and electronic ballots comply generally, where applicable, with the requirements of Title 20A, Chapter 6, Part 1, General Requirements for All Ballots, and this section; and

(c)  provide voting booths, election records and supplies, ballot boxes, and as applicable, voting devices, for each voting precinct as required by Section 20A-5-403.

(2) (a)  Notwithstanding the requirements of Subsections (1)(b) and (c), Title 20A, Chapter 6, Part 1, General Requirements for All Ballots, and Sections 20A-5-403, 20A-6-401, and 20A-6-401.1, the lieutenant governor, together with county clerks, suppliers of election materials, and representatives of registered political parties shall ensure that the paper ballots, ballot labels, ballot sheets, electronic ballots, and voting booths, election records and supplies, and ballot boxes:

(i)  facilitate the distribution, voting, and tallying of ballots in a primary where not all voters are authorized to vote for a party's candidate;

(ii)  simplify the task of poll workers, particularly in determining a voter's party affiliation;

(iii)  minimize the possibility of spoiled ballots due to voter confusion; and

(iv)  protect against fraud.

(b)  To accomplish the requirements of this Subsection (2), the lieutenant governor, county clerks, suppliers of election materials, and representatives of registered political parties shall:

(i)  mark, prepunch, or otherwise identify ballots and ballot sheets as being for a particular registered political party; and

(ii)  instruct persons counting the ballots to count only those votes for candidates from the registered political party whose ballot the voter received.



Amended by Chapter 326, 2006 General Session

